Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1708
City or village employees; serving outside corporate limits; regular line of duty.

All city or village employees serving outside the corporate limits of the city or village as authorized in sections 18-1706 to 18-1709 shall be considered and held as serving in their regular line of duties as fully as if they were serving within the corporate limits of the city or village which employs them.

Laws 1959, c. 55, § 3, p. 249;

Laws 1959, c. 56, § 2, p. 250;

Laws 1988, LB 369, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 95.